Illinois, session 104th, SB1989.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Kaskaskia Regional Port District Act is 5amended by changing Sections 3, 7.1, 20.1, 23.1, 26.1, 31, and 632 and by adding Section 51 as follows: 7    (70 ILCS 1830/3)  (from Ch. 19, par. 503)8    Sec. 3. There is created a political subdivision body 9politic and municipal corporation, named "Kaskaskia Regional 10Port District" embracing all of Monroe and Randolph Counties 11and Freeburg, Millstadt, Smithton, Prairie Du Long, New 12Athens, Marissa, Fayetteville, Engleman, Mascoutah, Shiloh 13Valley, Canteen, Centerville, East St. Louis, Stites, Sugar 14Loaf, and Lenzburg Townships of St. Clair County. The Port 15District may sue and be sued in its corporate name but 16execution shall not in any case issue against any property 17owned by the Port District except for Port District property 18that the Port District pledged as collateral to a bank or other 19financial institution to secure a bank loan. It may adopt a 20common seal and change the same at pleasure. The principal 21office of the Port District shall be in the city of Red Bud, 22Illinois.23    No rights, duties or privileges of such District, or those   SB1989 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1of any person, existing before the change of name shall be 2affected by the change provided by this amendatory Act of 31967. All proceedings pending in any court in favor of or 4against such District may continue to final consummation under 5the name in which they were commenced.6(Source: P.A. 99-507, eff. 6-24-16.) 7    (70 ILCS 1830/7.1)  (from Ch. 19, par. 507.1)8    Sec. 7.1. Additional rights and powers. The Port District 9has the following additional rights and powers:10        (a) To issue permits for the construction of all 11    wharves, piers, dolphins, booms, weirs, breakwaters, 12    bulkheads, jetties, bridges or other structures of any 13    kind, over, under, in, or within 40 feet of any navigable 14    waters within the Port District, for the deposit of rock, 15    earth, sand or other material, or any matter of any kind or 16    description in such waters;17        (b) To prevent and remove obstructions in navigable 18    waters, including the removal of wrecks or vessels; to 19    recover damages, including attorney fees, for the removal 20    and clean-up of the site or sites and the surrounding or 21    downstream environment; these rights and powers shall 22    include, but are not limited to, emergency powers to seize 23    wrecks or vessels, remediate damages, and provide for the 24    disposition of the wrecks or vessels;25        (c) To locate and establish dock lines and shore or   SB1989 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    harbor lines;2        (d) To regulate the anchorage, moorage and speed of 3    water borne vessels and to establish and enforce 4    regulations for the operation of bridges;5        (e) To acquire, own, construct, lease, operate and 6    maintain terminals, terminal facilities, port facilities, 7    transportation equipment facilities, railroads and 8    marinas, and airport facilities and systems, and to fix 9    and collect just, reasonable, and non-discriminatory 10    charges for use of such facilities, equipment and systems. 11    The charges so collected shall be used to defray the 12    reasonable expenses of the Port District, and to pay the 13    principal of and interest on any revenue bonds issued by 14    the Port District;15        (f) To operate, maintain, manage, lease, sub-lease, 16    and to make and enter into contracts for the use, 17    operation or management of, and to provide rules and 18    regulations for, the operation, management or use of, any 19    public port or public port facility;20        (g) To fix, charge and collect reasonable rentals, 21    tolls, fees and charges for the use of any public port, or 22    any part thereof, or any public port facility;23        (h) To establish, maintain, expand and improve 24    roadways, railroads, and approaches by land, or water, to 25    any such terminal, terminal facility and port facilities, 26    and to contract or otherwise provide by condemnation, if   SB1989 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    necessary, for the removal of any port, terminal, terminal 2    facilities and port facility hazards or the removal or 3    relocation of all private structures, railroads, mains, 4    pipes, conduits, wires, poles, and all other facilities 5    and equipment which may interfere with the location, 6    expansion, development or improvement of ports, terminals, 7    terminal facilities and port facilities or with the safe 8    approach thereto, or exit or takeoff therefrom by 9    vehicles, vessels, barges and other means of 10    transportation, and to pay the cost of removal or 11    relocation;12        (i) To police its physical property only and all 13    waterways and to exercise police powers in respect thereto 14    or in respect to the enforcement of any rule or regulation 15    provided by the ordinances of the District and to employ 16    and commission police officers and other qualified persons 17    to enforce such rules and regulations. A regulatory 18    ordinance of the District adopted under any provisions of 19    this Section may provide for a suspension or revocation of 20    any rights or privileges within the control of the 21    District for a violation of any such regulatory ordinance.22        (j) To enter into agreements with the corporate 23    authorities or governing body of any other municipal 24    corporation or any political subdivision of this State to 25    pay the reasonable expense of services furnished by such 26    municipal corporation or political subdivision for or on   SB1989 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    account of income producing properties of the District;2        (k) To enter into contracts dealing in any manner with 3    the objects and purposes of this Act;4        (l) To acquire, own, lease, mortgage, sell, or 5    otherwise dispose of interests in and to real property and 6    improvements situate thereon and in personal property 7    necessary to fulfill the purposes of the District;8        (m) To designate the fiscal year for the District;9        (n) To engage in any activity or operation which is 10    incidental to and in furtherance of efficient operation to 11    accomplish the District's primary purpose;12        (o) To acquire, erect, construct, maintain and operate 13    aquariums, museums, planetariums, climatrons and other 14    edifices for the collection and display of objects 15    pertaining to natural history or the arts and sciences and 16    to permit the directors or trustees of any corporation or 17    society organized for the erection, construction, 18    maintenance and operation of an aquarium, museum, 19    planetarium, climatron or other such edifice to perform 20    such erection, construction, maintenance and operation on 21    or within any property now or hereafter owned by or under 22    the control or supervision of the District; and to 23    contract with any such directors or trustees relative to 24    such acquisition, erection, construction, maintenance and 25    operation and to charge or authorize such directors or 26    trustees to charge an admission fee, the proceeds of which   SB1989 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    shall be devoted exclusively to such erection, 2    construction, maintenance and operation;3         (o) (p) To do any act which is enumerated in Section 4    11-74.1-1 of the "Illinois Municipal Code", in the same 5    manner and form as though the District were a 6    "municipality" as referred to in such Section;7        (p) (q) To acquire, own, erect, construct, lease, 8    reconstruct, improve, maintain and operate one or more, or 9    a combination or combinations of, industrial buildings, 10    office buildings, buildings to be used as a factory, mill 11    shops, processing plants, packaging plants, assembly 12    plants, fabricating plants, and buildings to be used as 13    warehouses and other storage facilities.14        (r) To acquire, own, construct, lease or contract for 15    any period not exceeding 99 years, operate, develop, and 16    maintain Port District water and sewage systems and other 17    utility systems and services, including, but not limited 18    to, pipes, mains, lines, sewers, pumping stations, 19    settling tanks, treatment plants, water purification 20    equipment, wells, storage facilities, lines, and all other 21    equipment, material, and facilities necessary to those 22    systems, for the use, upon payment of reasonable fee set 23    by the District, of any tenant, occupant, or user of the 24    District facilities or any person engaged in commerce in 25    the District; provided that the District shall not 26    acquire, own, construct, lease, operate, develop, and   SB1989 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    maintain the systems and services if those systems and 2    services can be provided by an investor-owned public 3    utility offering electric or gas services. The public 4    utility shall provide the District with a written 5    response, within 30 days after receiving a written request 6    from the District for those systems or services, stating 7    whether it will or will not be able to provide the 8    requested systems or services in accordance with the 9    Public Utilities Act.10(Source: P.A. 102-725, eff. 1-1-23.) 11    (70 ILCS 1830/20.1)  (from Ch. 19, par. 520.1)12    Sec. 20.1. The District has the continuing power to borrow 13money and issue either general obligation bonds or revenue 14bonds as provided in this Act for the purpose of acquiring, 15constructing, reconstructing, extending or improving or 16operating the terminals, terminal facilities, port facilities, 17aquariums, museums, planetariums, climatrons and other 18buildings or facilities which the District has the power to 19acquire, construct, reconstruct, extend or improve, and for 20acquiring any property and equipment useful for such 21construction, reconstruction, extension, improvement or 22operation, and for acquiring necessary cash working funds.23(Source: P.A. 77-2109.) 24    (70 ILCS 1830/23.1)  (from Ch. 19, par. 523.1)  SB1989 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    Sec. 23.1. All revenue bonds shall be payable solely from 2the revenues or income to be derived from the terminals, 3terminal facilities, port facilities, aquariums, museums, 4planetariums, climatrons and any other building or facility 5which the District has the power to acquire, construct, 6reconstruct, extend, or improve, or any part thereof, may bear 7such date or dates and may mature at such time or times not 8exceeding 40 years from their respective dates, all as may be 9provided in the ordinance authorizing their issuance. All 10general obligation bonds and revenue bonds may bear interest 11at such rate or rates not to exceed that permitted in the Bond 12Authorization Act "An Act to authorize public corporations to 13issue bonds, other evidences of indebtedness and tax 14anticipation warrants subject to interest rate limitations set 15forth therein", approved May 26, 1970, as now or hereafter 16amended. Such interest may be paid semiannually. All bonds, 17whether revenue or general obligations, may be in such form, 18may carry such registration privileges, may be executed in 19such manner, may be payable at such place or places, may be 20made subject to redemption in such manner and upon such terms, 21with or without premium as is stated on the face thereof, may 22be authenticated in such manner and may contain such terms and 23covenants, all as may be provided in the ordinance authorizing 24issuance.25    The holder or holders of any bonds or interest coupons 26appertaining thereto issued by the District may bring a civil   SB1989 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1suit to compel the performance and observance by the District 2or any of its officers, agents, or employees of any contract or 3covenant made by the District with the holders of such bonds or 4interest coupons and to compel the District and any of its 5officers, agents, or employees to perform any duties required 6to be performed for the benefit of the holders of any such 7bonds or interest coupons by the provision in the ordinance 8authorizing their issuance, and to enjoin the District and any 9of its officers, agents, or employees from taking any action 10in conflict with any such contract or covenant, including the 11establishment of charges, fees, and rates for the use of 12facilities as provided in this Act.13    Notwithstanding the form and tenor of any bond, whether 14revenue or general obligation, and in the absence of any 15express recital on the face thereof that it is nonnegotiable, 16all such bonds are negotiable instruments. Pending the 17preparation and execution of any such bonds, temporary bonds 18may be issued with or without interest coupons as may be 19provided by ordinance. 20(Source: P.A. 82-902; revised 7-19-24.) 21    (70 ILCS 1830/26.1)  (from Ch. 19, par. 526.1)22    Sec. 26.1. Upon the issue of any revenue bonds under this 23Act the Board shall fix and establish rates, charges and fees 24for the use of facilities acquired, constructed, 25reconstructed, extended or improved with the proceeds derived   SB1989 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1from the sale of such revenue bonds sufficient at all times 2with other revenues of the District, if any, to pay: (a) the 3cost of maintaining, repairing, regulating and operating such 4facilities; and (b) the bonds and interest thereon as they 5become due, and all sinking fund requirements and other 6requirements provided by the ordinance authorizing the 7issuance of the bonds or as provided by any trust agreement 8executed to secure payment thereof.9    To secure the payment of any or all revenue bonds and for 10the purpose of setting forth the covenants and undertaking of 11the District in connection with the issuance of revenue bonds 12and the issuance of any additional revenue bonds payable from 13such revenue income to be derived from the terminals, terminal 14facilities, port facilities, aquariums, museums, planetariums, 15climatrons and other buildings, or facilities which the 16District has the power to acquire, construct, reconstruct, 17extend or improve, the District may execute and deliver a 18trust agreement or agreements except that no lien upon any 19physical property of the District shall be created thereby. A 20remedy for any breach or default of the terms of any such trust 21agreement by the District may be by mandamus proceedings in 22the circuit court to compel performance and compliance 23therewith, but the trust agreement may prescribe by whom or on 24whose behalf such action may be instituted. 25(Source: P.A. 79-1361.)   SB1989 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    (70 ILCS 1830/31)  (from Ch. 19, par. 531)2    Sec. 31. The governing and administrative body of the Port 3District is a Board of 15 members, to be known as the Kaskaskia 4Regional Port District Board. All members of the Board shall 5be residents of the Port District and persons of recognized 6business ability. Eight members of the port district board 7shall reside in St. Clair County, 4 members shall reside in 8Randolph County, and 3 members shall reside in Monroe County. 9The members of the Board shall serve without compensation, but 10shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred by them in 11the performance of their duties. However, any member of the 12Board who is appointed to the office of secretary or treasurer 13may receive compensation fixed by the Board for services as 14such officer.15(Source: P.A. 80-323.) 16    (70 ILCS 1830/32)  (from Ch. 19, par. 532)17    Sec. 32. The Governor, by and with the advice and consent 18of the Senate, shall appoint the members of the Board and fill 19any and all vacancies. If the Senate is in recess when such 20appointment is made, the Governor shall make a temporary 21appointment until the next meeting of the Senate. The terms of 22all of the members appointed by the Governor as of May 1, 2025, 23expire upon this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 24taking effect, and each newly appointed member serves for 253-year terms. Of the members initially appointed by the   SB1989 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1Governor, 3 were appointed for initial terms expiring July 1, 21966, 3 for initial terms expiring July 1, 1967 and 3 for 3initial terms expiring July 1, 1968. Those appointments are 4not affected by this amendatory Act of 1967; however, within 560 days after this amendatory Act of 1967 takes effect, the 6Governor shall appoint 6 additional members to the Board. Of 7such members appointed, 2 shall be appointed for initial terms 8expiring July 1, 1968, 2 for initial terms expiring July 1, 91969, and 2 for initial terms expiring July 1, 1970. At the 10expiration of the term of any member, his successor shall be 11appointed by the Governor in like manner and with like regard 12to place of residence of the appointee.13(Source: Laws 1967, p. 1184.) 14    (70 ILCS 1830/51 new)15    Sec. 51. Transfer of authority to Kaskaskia Regional Port 16District. On the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 17104th General Assembly, the duties, authorities, operations, 18assets, properties, and other responsibilities of the 19Southwest Regional Port District are transferred and 20integrated into the Kaskaskia Regional Port District. This 21includes, but is not limited to, all books, records, papers, 22documents, property (real and personal), contracts, causes of 23action, unexpended appropriations, unexpended balances, and 24pending business pertaining to the powers, duties, rights, and 25responsibilities of the Southwest Regional Port District. This   SB1989 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1transfer shall be completed by December 1, 2025. 2    (70 ILCS 1855/Act rep.)3    Section 10. The Southwest Regional Port District Act is 4repealed. 5    Section 15. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by changing 6Section 15-5-15 as follows: 7    (735 ILCS 30/15-5-15)8    Sec. 15-5-15. Eminent domain powers in ILCS Chapters 70 9through 75. The following provisions of law may include 10express grants of the power to acquire property by 11condemnation or eminent domain: 12(70 ILCS 5/8.02 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 13    authorities; for public airport facilities.14(70 ILCS 5/8.05 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 15    authorities; for removal of airport hazards.16(70 ILCS 5/8.06 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 17    authorities; for reduction of the height of objects or 18    structures.19(70 ILCS 10/4); Interstate Airport Authorities Act; interstate 20    airport authorities; for general purposes.21(70 ILCS 15/3); Kankakee River Valley Area Airport Authority 22    Act; Kankakee River Valley Area Airport Authority; for   SB1989 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    acquisition of land for airports.2(70 ILCS 200/2-20); Civic Center Code; civic center 3    authorities; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.4(70 ILCS 200/5-35); Civic Center Code; Aledo Civic Center 5    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.6(70 ILCS 200/10-15); Civic Center Code; Aurora Metropolitan 7    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 8    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.9(70 ILCS 200/15-40); Civic Center Code; Benton Civic Center 10    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.11(70 ILCS 200/20-15); Civic Center Code; Bloomington Civic 12    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 13    parking.14(70 ILCS 200/35-35); Civic Center Code; Brownstown Park 15    District Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, 16    buildings, and parking.17(70 ILCS 200/40-35); Civic Center Code; Carbondale Civic 18    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 19    parking.20(70 ILCS 200/55-60); Civic Center Code; Chicago South Civic 21    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 22    parking.23(70 ILCS 200/60-30); Civic Center Code; Collinsville 24    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 25    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.26(70 ILCS 200/70-35); Civic Center Code; Crystal Lake Civic   SB1989 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 2    parking.3(70 ILCS 200/75-20); Civic Center Code; Decatur Metropolitan 4    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 5    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.6(70 ILCS 200/80-15); Civic Center Code; DuPage County 7    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 8    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.9(70 ILCS 200/85-35); Civic Center Code; Elgin Metropolitan 10    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 11    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.12(70 ILCS 200/95-25); Civic Center Code; Herrin Metropolitan 13    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 14    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.15(70 ILCS 200/110-35); Civic Center Code; Illinois Valley Civic 16    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 17    parking.18(70 ILCS 200/115-35); Civic Center Code; Jasper County Civic 19    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 20    parking.21(70 ILCS 200/120-25); Civic Center Code; Jefferson County 22    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 23    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.24(70 ILCS 200/125-15); Civic Center Code; Jo Daviess County 25    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 26    and parking.  SB1989 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1(70 ILCS 200/130-30); Civic Center Code; Katherine Dunham 2    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 3    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.4(70 ILCS 200/145-35); Civic Center Code; Marengo Civic Center 5    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.6(70 ILCS 200/150-35); Civic Center Code; Mason County Civic 7    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 8    parking.9(70 ILCS 200/155-15); Civic Center Code; Matteson Metropolitan 10    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 11    and parking.12(70 ILCS 200/160-35); Civic Center Code; Maywood Civic Center 13    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.14(70 ILCS 200/165-35); Civic Center Code; Melrose Park 15    Metropolitan Exposition Auditorium and Office Building 16    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.17(70 ILCS 200/170-20); Civic Center Code; certain Metropolitan 18    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authorities; 19    for general purposes.20(70 ILCS 200/180-35); Civic Center Code; Normal Civic Center 21    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.22(70 ILCS 200/185-15); Civic Center Code; Oak Park Civic Center 23    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.24(70 ILCS 200/195-35); Civic Center Code; Ottawa Civic Center 25    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.26(70 ILCS 200/200-15); Civic Center Code; Pekin Civic Center   SB1989 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.2(70 ILCS 200/205-15); Civic Center Code; Peoria Civic Center 3    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.4(70 ILCS 200/210-35); Civic Center Code; Pontiac Civic Center 5    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.6(70 ILCS 200/215-15); Civic Center Code; Illinois Quad City 7    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 8    and parking.9(70 ILCS 200/220-30); Civic Center Code; Quincy Metropolitan 10    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 11    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.12(70 ILCS 200/225-35); Civic Center Code; Randolph County Civic 13    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 14    parking.15(70 ILCS 200/230-35); Civic Center Code; River Forest 16    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 17    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.18(70 ILCS 200/235-40); Civic Center Code; Riverside Civic 19    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 20    parking.21(70 ILCS 200/245-35); Civic Center Code; Salem Civic Center 22    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.23(70 ILCS 200/255-20); Civic Center Code; Springfield 24    Metropolitan Exposition and Auditorium Authority; for 25    grounds, centers, and parking.26(70 ILCS 200/260-35); Civic Center Code; Sterling Metropolitan   SB1989 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 2    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.3(70 ILCS 200/265-20); Civic Center Code; Vermilion County 4    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 5    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.6(70 ILCS 200/270-35); Civic Center Code; Waukegan Civic Center 7    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.8(70 ILCS 200/275-35); Civic Center Code; West Frankfort Civic 9    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 10    parking.11(70 ILCS 200/280-20); Civic Center Code; Will County 12    Metropolitan Exposition and Auditorium Authority; for 13    grounds, centers, and parking.14(70 ILCS 210/5); Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority 15    Act; Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority; for 16    general purposes, including quick-take power.17(70 ILCS 405/22.04); Soil and Water Conservation Districts 18    Act; soil and water conservation districts; for general 19    purposes.20(70 ILCS 410/10 and 410/12); Conservation District Act; 21    conservation districts; for open space, wildland, scenic 22    roadway, pathway, outdoor recreation, or other 23    conservation benefits.24(70 ILCS 503/25); Chanute-Rantoul National Aviation Center 25    Redevelopment Commission Act; Chanute-Rantoul National 26    Aviation Center Redevelopment Commission; for general   SB1989 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    purposes.2(70 ILCS 507/15); Fort Sheridan Redevelopment Commission Act; 3    Fort Sheridan Redevelopment Commission; for general 4    purposes or to carry out comprehensive or redevelopment 5    plans.6(70 ILCS 520/8); Southwestern Illinois Development Authority 7    Act; Southwestern Illinois Development Authority; for 8    general purposes, including quick-take power.9(70 ILCS 605/4-17 and 605/5-7); Illinois Drainage Code; 10    drainage districts; for general purposes.11(70 ILCS 615/5 and 615/6); Chicago Drainage District Act; 12    corporate authorities; for construction and maintenance of 13    works.14(70 ILCS 705/10); Fire Protection District Act; fire 15    protection districts; for general purposes.16(70 ILCS 750/20); Flood Prevention District Act; flood 17    prevention districts; for general purposes.18(70 ILCS 805/6); Downstate Forest Preserve District Act; 19    certain forest preserve districts; for general purposes.20(70 ILCS 805/18.8); Downstate Forest Preserve District Act; 21    certain forest preserve districts; for recreational and 22    cultural facilities.23(70 ILCS 810/8); Cook County Forest Preserve District Act; 24    Forest Preserve District of Cook County; for general 25    purposes.26(70 ILCS 810/38); Cook County Forest Preserve District Act;   SB1989 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    Forest Preserve District of Cook County; for recreational 2    facilities.3(70 ILCS 910/15 and 910/16); Hospital District Law; hospital 4    districts; for hospitals or hospital facilities.5(70 ILCS 915/3); Illinois Medical District Act; Illinois 6    Medical District Commission; for general purposes.7(70 ILCS 915/4.5); Illinois Medical District Act; Illinois 8    Medical District Commission; quick-take power for the 9    Illinois State Police Forensic Science Laboratory 10    (obsolete).11(70 ILCS 920/5); Tuberculosis Sanitarium District Act; 12    tuberculosis sanitarium districts; for tuberculosis 13    sanitariums.14(70 ILCS 925/20); Mid-Illinois Medical District Act; 15    Mid-Illinois Medical District; for general purposes.16(70 ILCS 930/20); Mid-America Medical District Act; 17    Mid-America Medical District Commission; for general 18    purposes.19(70 ILCS 935/20); Roseland Community Medical District Act; 20    medical district; for general purposes.21(70 ILCS 1005/7); Mosquito Abatement District Act; mosquito 22    abatement districts; for general purposes.23(70 ILCS 1105/8); Museum District Act; museum districts; for 24    general purposes.25(70 ILCS 1205/7-1); Park District Code; park districts; for 26    streets and other purposes.  SB1989 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1(70 ILCS 1205/8-1); Park District Code; park districts; for 2    parks.3(70 ILCS 1205/9-2 and 1205/9-4); Park District Code; park 4    districts; for airports and landing fields.5(70 ILCS 1205/11-2 and 1205/11-3); Park District Code; park 6    districts; for State land abutting public water and 7    certain access rights.8(70 ILCS 1205/11.1-3); Park District Code; park districts; for 9    harbors.10(70 ILCS 1225/2); Park Commissioners Land Condemnation Act; 11    park districts; for street widening.12(70 ILCS 1230/1 and 1230/1-a); Park Commissioners Water 13    Control Act; park districts; for parks, boulevards, 14    driveways, parkways, viaducts, bridges, or tunnels.15(70 ILCS 1250/2); Park Commissioners Street Control (1889) 16    Act; park districts; for boulevards or driveways.17(70 ILCS 1290/1); Park District Aquarium and Museum Act; 18    municipalities or park districts; for aquariums or 19    museums.20(70 ILCS 1305/2); Park District Airport Zoning Act; park 21    districts; for restriction of the height of structures.22(70 ILCS 1310/5); Park District Elevated Highway Act; park 23    districts; for elevated highways.24(70 ILCS 1505/15); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park 25    District; for parks and other purposes.26(70 ILCS 1505/25.1); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park   SB1989 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    District; for parking lots or garages.2(70 ILCS 1505/26.3); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park 3    District; for harbors.4(70 ILCS 1570/5); Lincoln Park Commissioners Land Condemnation 5    Act; Lincoln Park Commissioners; for land and interests in 6    land, including riparian rights.7(70 ILCS 1801/30); Alexander-Cairo Port District Act; 8    Alexander-Cairo Port District; for general purposes.9(70 ILCS 1805/8); Havana Regional Port District Act; Havana 10    Regional Port District; for general purposes.11(70 ILCS 1810/7); Illinois International Port District Act; 12    Illinois International Port District; for general 13    purposes.14(70 ILCS 1815/13); Illinois Valley Regional Port District Act; 15    Illinois Valley Regional Port District; for general 16    purposes.17(70 ILCS 1820/4); Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 18    District Act; Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 19    District; for removal of airport hazards or reduction of 20    the height of objects or structures.21(70 ILCS 1820/5); Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 22    District Act; Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 23    District; for general purposes.24(70 ILCS 1825/4.9); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 25    Regional Port District; for removal of airport hazards.26(70 ILCS 1825/4.10); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet   SB1989 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    Regional Port District; for reduction of the height of 2    objects or structures.3(70 ILCS 1825/4.18); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 4    Regional Port District; for removal of hazards from ports 5    and terminals.6(70 ILCS 1825/5); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 7    Regional Port District; for general purposes.8(70 ILCS 1830/7.1); Kaskaskia Regional Port District Act; 9    Kaskaskia Regional Port District; for removal of hazards 10    from ports and terminals.11(70 ILCS 1830/14); Kaskaskia Regional Port District Act; 12    Kaskaskia Regional Port District; for general purposes.13(70 ILCS 1831/30); Massac-Metropolis Port District Act; 14    Massac-Metropolis Port District; for general purposes.15(70 ILCS 1835/5.10); Mt. Carmel Regional Port District Act; 16    Mt. Carmel Regional Port District; for removal of airport 17    hazards.18(70 ILCS 1835/5.11); Mt. Carmel Regional Port District Act; 19    Mt. Carmel Regional Port District; for reduction of the 20    height of objects or structures.21(70 ILCS 1835/6); Mt. Carmel Regional Port District Act; Mt. 22    Carmel Regional Port District; for general purposes.23(70 ILCS 1837/30); Ottawa Port District Act; Ottawa Port 24    District; for general purposes.25(70 ILCS 1845/4.9); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca 26    Regional Port District; for removal of airport hazards.  SB1989 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1(70 ILCS 1845/4.10); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca 2    Regional Port District; for reduction of the height of 3    objects or structures.4(70 ILCS 1845/5); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca 5    Regional Port District; for general purposes.6(70 ILCS 1850/4); Shawneetown Regional Port District Act; 7    Shawneetown Regional Port District; for removal of airport 8    hazards or reduction of the height of objects or 9    structures.10(70 ILCS 1850/5); Shawneetown Regional Port District Act; 11    Shawneetown Regional Port District; for general purposes.12    (70 ILCS 1855/4); Southwest Regional Port District Act; 13    Southwest Regional Port District; for removal of airport 14    hazards or reduction of the height of objects or 15    structures.16    (70 ILCS 1855/5); Southwest Regional Port District Act; 17    Southwest Regional Port District; for general purposes.18(70 ILCS 1860/4); Tri-City Regional Port District Act; 19    Tri-City Regional Port District; for removal of airport 20    hazards.21(70 ILCS 1860/5); Tri-City Regional Port District Act; 22    Tri-City Regional Port District; for the development of 23    facilities.24(70 ILCS 1863/11); Upper Mississippi River International Port 25    District Act; Upper Mississippi River International Port 26    District; for general purposes.  SB1989 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1(70 ILCS 1865/4.9); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port 2    District; for removal of airport hazards.3(70 ILCS 1865/4.10); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port 4    District; for restricting the height of objects or 5    structures.6(70 ILCS 1865/5); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port 7    District; for the development of facilities.8(70 ILCS 1870/8); White County Port District Act; White County 9    Port District; for the development of facilities.10(70 ILCS 1905/16); Railroad Terminal Authority Act; Railroad 11    Terminal Authority (Chicago); for general purposes.12(70 ILCS 1915/25); Grand Avenue Railroad Relocation Authority 13    Act; Grand Avenue Railroad Relocation Authority; for 14    general purposes, including quick-take power (now 15    obsolete).16(70 ILCS 1935/25); Elmwood Park Grade Separation Authority 17    Act; Elmwood Park Grade Separation Authority; for general 18    purposes.19(70 ILCS 2105/9b); River Conservancy Districts Act; river 20    conservancy districts; for general purposes.21(70 ILCS 2105/10a); River Conservancy Districts Act; river 22    conservancy districts; for corporate purposes.23(70 ILCS 2205/15); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary 24    districts; for corporate purposes.25(70 ILCS 2205/18); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary 26    districts; for improvements and works.  SB1989 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1(70 ILCS 2205/19); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary 2    districts; for access to property.3(70 ILCS 2305/8); North Shore Water Reclamation District Act; 4    North Shore Water Reclamation District; for corporate 5    purposes.6(70 ILCS 2305/15); North Shore Water Reclamation District Act; 7    North Shore Water Reclamation District; for improvements.8(70 ILCS 2405/7.9); Sanitary District Act of 1917; Sanitary 9    District of Decatur; for carrying out agreements to sell, 10    convey, or disburse treated wastewater to a private 11    entity.12(70 ILCS 2405/8); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 13    districts; for corporate purposes.14(70 ILCS 2405/15); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 15    districts; for improvements.16(70 ILCS 2405/16.9 and 2405/16.10); Sanitary District Act of 17    1917; sanitary districts; for waterworks.18(70 ILCS 2405/17.2); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 19    districts; for public sewer and water utility treatment 20    works.21(70 ILCS 2405/18); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 22    districts; for dams or other structures to regulate water 23    flow.24(70 ILCS 2605/8); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act; 25    Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for corporate 26    purposes.  SB1989 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1(70 ILCS 2605/16); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 2    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; quick-take 3    power for improvements.4(70 ILCS 2605/17); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 5    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for bridges.6(70 ILCS 2605/35); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 7    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for widening 8    and deepening a navigable stream.9(70 ILCS 2805/10); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 10    districts; for corporate purposes.11(70 ILCS 2805/24); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 12    districts; for improvements.13(70 ILCS 2805/26i and 2805/26j); Sanitary District Act of 14    1936; sanitary districts; for drainage systems.15(70 ILCS 2805/27); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 16    districts; for dams or other structures to regulate water 17    flow.18(70 ILCS 2805/32k); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 19    districts; for water supply.20(70 ILCS 2805/32l); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 21    districts; for waterworks.22(70 ILCS 2905/2-7); Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974; 23    Metro-East Sanitary District; for corporate purposes.24(70 ILCS 2905/2-8); Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974; 25    Metro-East Sanitary District; for access to property.26(70 ILCS 3010/10); Sanitary District Revenue Bond Act;   SB1989 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1    sanitary districts; for sewerage systems.2(70 ILCS 3205/12); Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act; 3    Illinois Sports Facilities Authority; quick-take power for 4    its corporate purposes (obsolete).5(70 ILCS 3405/16); Surface Water Protection District Act; 6    surface water protection districts; for corporate 7    purposes.8(70 ILCS 3605/7); Metropolitan Transit Authority Act; Chicago 9    Transit Authority; for transportation systems.10(70 ILCS 3605/8); Metropolitan Transit Authority Act; Chicago 11    Transit Authority; for general purposes.12(70 ILCS 3605/10); Metropolitan Transit Authority Act; Chicago 13    Transit Authority; for general purposes, including 14    railroad property.15(70 ILCS 3610/3 and 3610/5); Local Mass Transit District Act; 16    local mass transit districts; for general purposes.17(70 ILCS 3615/2.13); Regional Transportation Authority Act; 18    Regional Transportation Authority; for general purposes.19(70 ILCS 3705/8 and 3705/12); Public Water District Act; 20    public water districts; for waterworks.21(70 ILCS 3705/23a); Public Water District Act; public water 22    districts; for sewerage properties.23(70 ILCS 3705/23e); Public Water District Act; public water 24    districts; for combined waterworks and sewerage systems.25(70 ILCS 3715/6); Water Authorities Act; water authorities; 26    for facilities to ensure adequate water supply.  SB1989 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 10242 RTM 20316 b1(70 ILCS 3715/27); Water Authorities Act; water authorities; 2    for access to property.3(75 ILCS 5/4-7); Illinois Local Library Act; boards of library 4    trustees; for library buildings.5(75 ILCS 16/30-55.80); Public Library District Act of 1991; 6    public library districts; for general purposes.7(75 ILCS 65/1 and 65/3); Libraries in Parks Act; corporate 8    authorities of city or park district, or board of park 9    commissioners; for free public library buildings.10(Source: Incorporates 98-564, eff. 8-27-13; P.A. 98-756, eff. 117-16-14; 99-669, eff. 7-29-16.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.